output/hyph-id.level3.pat.txt
wo3la
wo3n2a
wo3ni
wori2
2w1r
2w1t
3wu
wu3d
wu3h2
wujud3
wu2ka
wu3l2
wulu3s
wu3na
wur1a
wu2ri
wu3s
wuyu3
2w1y
xi3l2
x1p
yada2
ya3g
yah3an
ya3hub
yahut3
ya3ira
ya3i3t2
yak3ay
yaki2
ya3li
yalib3
yam2a
yama3h
yami2
yamik3
ya2pa
ya3pad
yapa3t
ya2pi
yapu3k
yas2
ya3sa
yata3
yatu3k
ya1uh
ya3uk1
ya1ul
ya1up
yau2r
yawer3
y1b
2y3c
y1d
yebab3
yega2
ye3ka
yemu3k
ye3ngi
ye3ngu
ye3ra
ye3r2e
yerta3
yeru3k
yesa2
ye3ta
yetop3
ye2u2
yeur1
y1f
2y1g
y1h
yi3f
yika2
yiku3
yi3l
yilu3
yina2
yira2
yiri2
yirik3
yisi2
yisip3
2y1j
y1k
2y1l
y2o
yo3ha
yo2ka
yo2m
yong1
yopa2
yopi2
yo2t1
y1r
2y1s
y1t
yua3s
yu3hu
yu3ka
yuku2
yu3l
yula3k
yu2ma
yu2mi
yusu3k
yut1
yu2ti
1yuz
2y1w
2y1y
za2a
za1h
za2i
za3im
zali2
zalim3
zam2a
za3ti
2z1b
2z1d
1ze
ze3i
ze3k
2z1h
zi3b
zim3an
zio2
zi3p
2z1k
z1l
zlo3
2z1m
2z1n
zoe3
zo3ha
zo3i
zono3
zo3o
zos3f
2z1t
zu1h
zu3k
zu3n
zu3r
2z1y
2z1z
ê1d
ê1n
ê3r
êra1
